Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-2218.02
Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice, defined.

Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice means the standards adopted and promulgated by The Appraisal Foundation as the standards existed on January 1, 2024.

Laws 2001, LB 162, § 11;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 76-2218.01;

Laws 2006, LB 778, § 31;

Laws 2007, LB186, § 5;

Laws 2008, LB1011, § 2;

Laws 2010, LB931, § 4;

Laws 2012, LB714, § 2;

Laws 2014, LB717, § 10;

R.S.Supp.,2014, § 76-2213.01;

Laws 2015, LB139, § 36;

Laws 2016, LB731, § 6;

Laws 2018, LB741, § 24;

Laws 2020, LB808, § 66;

Laws 2021, LB23, § 2;

Laws 2024, LB992, § 5.